Washington statutes.
RCW 16.52.185

Exclusions from chapter.

Nothing in this chapter applies to accepted husbandry practices used in the commercial raising or slaughtering of livestock or poultry, or products thereof or to the use of animals in the normal and usual course of rodeo events or to the customary use or exhibiting of animals in normal and usual events at fairs as defined in RCW 15.76.120.

[ 1994 c 261 s 22; 1982 c 114 s 10.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—1994 c 261: See note following RCW 16.52.011.